Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. General Provisions.

Administrative Code. —

For statewide goals, see 4 AAC 04.

Sec. 14.03.010.
Establishment of school system.

There is established in the state a system of public schools to be administered and maintained as provided in this title.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.03.015.
State education policy.

It is the policy of this state that the purpose of education is to help ensure that all students will succeed in their education and work, shape worthwhile and satisfying lives for themselves, exemplify the best values of society, and be effective in improving the character and quality of the world about them.

History.

(§ 1 ch 173 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For statewide goals, see 4 AAC 4.

For statewide student assessment, see 4 AAC 6, art. 4.

Sec. 14.03.016.
A parent’s right to direct the education of the parent’s child.

A local school board shall, in consultation with parents, teachers, and school administrators, adopt policies to promote the involvement of parents in the school district’s education program. The policies must include procedures

recognizing the authority of a parent and allowing a parent to object to and withdraw the child from a standards-based assessment or test required by the state;

recognizing the authority of a parent and allowing a parent to object to and withdraw the child from an activity, class, or program;

providing for parent notification not less than two weeks before any activity, class, or program that includes content involving human reproduction or sexual matters is provided to a child;

recognizing the authority of a parent and allowing a parent to withdraw the child from an activity, class, program, or standards-based assessment or test required by the state for a religious holiday, as defined by the parent;

providing a parent with an opportunity to review the content of an activity, class, performance standard, or program;

ensuring that, when a child is absent from an activity, class, program, or standards-based assessment or test required by the state under this section, the absence is not considered an unlawful absence under AS

14.30.020

if the child’s parent withdrew the child from the activity, class, program, or standards-based assessment or test or gave permission for the child’s absence.

The policies adopted under this section may not allow a parent categorically to object to or withdraw a child from all activities, classes, programs, or standards-based assessments or tests required by the state. The policies must require a parent to object each time the parent wishes to withdraw the child from an activity, class, program, or standards-based assessment or test required by the state.

Nothing in this section prohibits a school employee or volunteer from answering a question from a child about any topic.

In this section,

“child” means an unemancipated minor under 18 years of age;

“human reproduction or sexual matters” does not include curricula or materials for

sexual abuse and sexual assault awareness and prevention training required under AS

14.30.355

; or

dating violence and abuse awareness and prevention training required under AS

14.30.356

;

“local school board” has the meaning given in AS

14.03.290

;

“parent” means the natural or adoptive parent of a child or a child’s legal guardian;

“school district” has the meaning given in AS

14.30.350

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 54 SLA 2016; am § 2 ch 54 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraphs (2) — (5) were enacted as paragraphs (5) and (2) — (4) respectively and renumbered in 2016 for alphabetical consistency.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 26, 2016, added (d)(5) [now (d)(2)].

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 54, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on October 26, 2016.

Sec. 14.03.020.
School year.

The school year begins on the first day of July and ends on the 30th day of June.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Opinions of attorney general. —

School districts may choose whether or not to permit part-time enrollment of private school students, unless the department adopts a contrary policy. June 24, 1993, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.03.030.
School term.

A school term begins and ends on the dates fixed by the governing body of a school district. A school term shall include not less than 180 days in session unless, with the approval of the commissioner,

a day used for in-service training of teachers is substituted for a day in session, up to a maximum of 10 days;

an “emergency closure day” is substituted for a day in session because of conditions posing a threat to the health or safety of students; or

the school board adopts a different school term that includes at least 740 hours of instruction and study periods for pupils in kindergarten, first grade, second grade, and third grade and at least 900 hours of instruction and study periods for pupils in grades four through 12 if the commissioner finds that the school board has submitted an acceptable plan under which students will receive the approximate educational equivalent of a 180-day term.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 65 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 137 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 1979; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 71 SLA 1985; am §§ 2, 3 ch 33 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For legislative intent concerning the 1991 amendments to this section, see § 1, ch. 33, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For local education, see 4 AAC 5.

For allowances for professional personnel, see 4 AAC 15.

Sec. 14.03.040.
Day in session.

Each day within the school term is a day in session except Saturdays, Sundays, and days designated as holidays by or according to AS

14.03.050

.
A school board may approve Saturdays as a day in session.
The day in session in every school shall be at least four hours long, exclusive of intermissions, for the first, second, and third grades and five hours, exclusive of intermissions, for all other grades. The commissioner may approve a shorter day in session for any grade. The period of the day in session shall be devoted to the instruction of pupils or to study periods for the pupils.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 137 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For correspondence study programs, see 4 AAC 33, art. 4.

Sec. 14.03.050.
School holidays.

Public schools may not be in session on school holidays, which are Labor Day, Thanksgiving Day, the day immediately following Thanksgiving Day, Christmas Day, New Years Day, Memorial Day, and the Fourth of July. If one of these holidays falls on a Saturday, the Friday immediately preceding is a school holiday. If one of these holidays falls on a Sunday, the Monday immediately following is a school holiday. A teacher may not be required to perform employment services on these holidays, nor may the salary of a teacher be diminished because the teacher does not perform employment services on a school holiday.

The public schools shall be in session on all other holidays falling upon school days and shall conduct appropriate exercises in recognition of the day.

The governing body of the school district may declare additional holidays.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

Sec. 14.03.060.
Elementary, junior high, and secondary schools.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, an elementary school consists of grades kindergarten through grade eight or any appropriate combination of grades within this range.

A secondary school consists of grades seven through 12 or any appropriate combination of grades within this range. The establishment of one or two grades beyond the 12th grade is optional with the governing body of the school district.

Grades seven through eight, nine, and ten or any appropriate combination of grades within this range may be organized as a junior high school.

This section does not prevent a high school from issuing a diploma to a student who has completed the 12th grade.

In addition to the grades enumerated in (a) of this section, an elementary school consists of a pre-elementary program supervised by the department under AS

14.07.020(a)(8)

, operated by the department as a head start program under AS

14.38.010

, or located in a public school for federal funding purposes. Except for a child with a disability who is receiving special education or related services under AS

14.30.180

—

14.30.350

, pre-elementary students may not be counted in a school’s average daily membership under AS 14.17.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am §§ 1, 2 ch 117 SLA 2008)

Collateral references. —

Zoning regulations as applied to public elementary and high schools. 74 ALR3d 136.

Sec. 14.03.070.
School age.

A child who is six years of age on or before September 1 following the beginning of the school year, and who is under the age of 20 and has not completed the 12th grade, is of school age.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1987; am § 19 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 101 SLA 2004)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective July 1, 2004, substituted “on or before September 1” for “before August 15.”

Collateral references. —

Power of public school authorities to set minimum or maximum age requirements for pupils in absence of specific statutory authority. 78 ALR2d 1021.

Sec. 14.03.072.
Early literacy information.

Each school district shall annually provide to parents and guardians of students enrolled in kindergarten through grade three in a public school in the state current information on the importance of early literacy, including

intervention strategies;

home literacy plans;

grade retention standards and policies for the elementary school attended;

strategies and resources to help children learn to read.

In partnership with local media outlets, the department shall create and implement a communications campaign to educate parents and guardians about the importance of early literacy. The campaign shall include an Internet website that provides access to current research on early literacy, book recommendations, and vocabulary-building exercises.

History.

(§ 1 ch 69 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 7, ch. 69, SLA 2013 makes this section effective July 11, 2013.

Sec. 14.03.073.
Secondary school course credit.

A school district shall provide the opportunity for students enrolled in grades nine through 12 in the district to challenge one or more courses provided by the district by demonstrating mastery in mathematics, language arts, science, social studies, and world languages at the level of the course challenged. A school district shall give full credit for a course to a student who successfully challenges that course as provided under this section.

A school district shall establish, within a reasonable time, an assessment tool and a standard for demonstrating mastery in courses provided for students in grades nine through 12 by the district under this section. This section does not require a school district to establish an assessment tool for every course in mathematics, language arts, science, social studies, and world languages that is offered to students in grades nine through 12 by the district.

The board shall adopt regulations to implement this section.

In this section, “school district” has the meaning given in AS

14.30.350

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 15 SLA 2014; am §§ 2, 3 ch 2 SSSLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 15, SLA 2014, see 2014 House Journal 1434 — 1437.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective October 7, 2015, in the first sentence in (a), substituted “in grades nine through 12 in the district to challenge one or more courses” for “in a secondary school in the district to challenge a course”; in (b), in the first sentence, substituted “in courses provided for students in grades nine through 12” for “in secondary school courses provided”, and added the second sentence.

Effective dates. —

Section 62, ch. 15, SLA 2014 makes this section effective July 1, 2014.

Sec. 14.03.075.
College and career readiness assessment; retroactive issuance of diploma.

[Repealed, §§ 25, 29 ch 2 SSSLA 2015.]

[Repealed, §§ 25, 29 ch 2 SSSLA 2015.]

[Repealed, §§ 25, 29 ch 2 SSSLA 2015.]

At the request of a student, a school district shall issue a high school diploma to a student who did not receive a high school diploma because the student failed to pass all or a portion of the secondary school competency examination but who received a certificate of achievement under this section as it read before July 1, 2014.

In this section,

[Repealed, §§ 25, 29 ch 2 SSSLA 2015.]

“school district” has the meaning given in AS

14.30.350

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 94 SLA 2001; am § 24 ch 35 SLA 2003; am § 14 ch 41 SLA 2009; am § 3 ch 15 SLA 2014; am § 25 ch 2 SSSLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) and paragraph (e)(2) were enacted as part of sec. 51, ch. 15, SLA 2014, and codified in 2014, at which time “under this section as it read before July 1, 2014” was substituted for “under former AS

14.03.075

”
to reflect the codification.
For the full text of sec. 51, ch. 15, SLA 2014, see the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 15, SLA 2014, which repealed and reenacted this section, see 2014 House Journal 1434 - 1437.

Administrative Code. —

For statewide student assessment, see 4 AAC 6, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, rewrote the section, which formerly related to standards and processes for secondary student competency testing.

The 2015 amendment, effective June 30, 2016, repealed (a), (b), (c), and (e)(1).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 51(a), ch. 15, SLA 2014 requires that a school district mail a notice consistent with (d) of this section to each student who qualifies for a diploma under (d) of this section to the student’s last known address.

Section 51(b), ch. 15, SLA 2014 requires that the Department of Education and Early Development post a notice consistent with subsection (d) on the department’s internet website with information about how to request a high school diploma.

Sec. 14.03.077.
High school diploma for certain veterans.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the commissioner shall award a high school diploma to a person who

makes application under (b) of this section; if a person is deceased or incapacitated, an immediate family member may apply on behalf of the person;

never received a high school diploma; and

actively served in the United States armed forces or the Alaska Territorial Guard during the period of August 7, 1940, through July 25, 1947, and

died in active service;

was honorably discharged; or

was released from active duty because of a service-related disability.

The commissioner shall provide a form or electronic format for a person to apply under this section. The commissioner may accept an affidavit to support the award if documentation is not readily available from the military or other sources.

History.

(§ 1 ch 13 SLA 2001)

Sec. 14.03.078.
Annual progress reports.

The department shall provide to the legislature by February 15 of each year by electronic means an annual report regarding the progress of each school and school district toward high academic performance by all students. The report required under this section must include

information described under AS

14.03.120(d)

;

progress of the department

toward implementing the school accountability provisions of AS

14.03.123

; and

in assisting high schools to become accredited;

a description of the resources provided to each school and school district for coordinated school improvement activities and staff training in each school and school district;

each school district’s and each school’s progress in aligning curriculum with state education performance standards;

a description of the efforts by the department to assist a public school or district that receives a low performance designation under AS

14.03.123

;

a description of intervention efforts by each school district and school for students who are not meeting state performance standards; and

the number and percentage of turnover in certificated personnel and superintendents.

By December 31 of each year, the department shall provide to the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority established by AS

47.30.011

a report on the progress of school districts in the state toward the objective of AS

14.30.278(b)

, based on performance indicators included in the most current plan submitted by the state to the United States Secretary of Education as required under 20 U.S.C. 1412(a).

History.

(§ 4 ch 94 SLA 2001; am § 4 ch 15 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (a), inserted “by electronic means” following “of each year”; deleted (a)(2), which read, “The number and percentage of students in each school who pass the examination required under AS

14.03.075

, and the number who pass each section of the examination”; in (a)(6), substituted “or district that receives a low performance designation under AS

14.03.123

” for “that receives designation of deficient or in crisis”; deleted (a)(9), which read, “The number of teachers by district and by school who are teaching outside the teacher’s area of endorsement but in areas tested by the high school competency examination”; made related changes.

The second 2014 amendment, effective August 27, 2014, added (b).

Sec. 14.03.080.
Right to attend school.

A child of school age is entitled to attend public school without payment of tuition during the school term in the school district in which the child is a resident subject to the provisions of AS

14.14.110

and

14.14.120

.

A person over school age may be admitted to the public school in the school district in which the person is a resident at the discretion of the governing body of the school district. A person over school age may be charged tuition by the governing body of the school district.

A child under school age may be admitted to a public school in the school district of which the child is a resident at the discretion of the governing body of the school district if the child meets minimum standards prescribed by the board evidencing that the child has the mental, physical, and emotional capacity to perform satisfactorily for the educational program being offered. A district’s educational program must prescribe that under school age students advance through the curriculum or grade level by the following school year. A governing body may delegate the authority granted under this subsection to the chief school administrator of the school district.

A child who is five years of age on or before September 1 following the beginning of the school year, and who is under school age, may enter a public school kindergarten.

A child under school age shall be admitted to school in the district of which the child is a resident if immediately before the child became a resident of the district, the child was legally enrolled in the public schools of another district or state.

This section does not require a school district to admit a child or person currently under suspension or expulsion under AS

14.03.160

in that or another school district.

A school district shall consider a student to be a resident of the district and admit the student to a public school in the district if a parent or guardian of the student is serving as an active duty member of the armed forces of the United States or a member of the National Guard and is transferred or pending transfer under an official military order to a military installation in the state from another military installation in the state or from outside of the state. A parent or guardian of the student shall provide to the school district written proof of residence in the state on an official document within 30 days of the student’s first day of attendance in the school district. In this subsection,

“guardian” has the meaning given in AS

13.06.050

;

“military installation” means a base, camp, post, station, yard, center, homeport facility for a ship, armory, or other installation under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Defense or the United States Coast Guard;

“residence” means the principal dwelling place of an active duty parent or guardian.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 1 FSSLA 1987; am § 20 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 33 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 2003; am §§ 2, 3 ch 101 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 2022)

Administrative Code. —

For local education, see 4 AAC 5.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A school district must permit a child who is temporarily hospitalized or attending a treatment facility in the district to enroll as a student in, and receive educational services from, the district. If the child is an exceptional child, the district must ordinarily provide special education and related services. If the child is placed within the district in accordance with an Individualized Education Plan developed by his or her home district, however, that district must make arrangements for the child’s education. August 12, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Under current laws, public schools may, but are not required to enroll private school students on a part time basis. June 24, 1993 Op. Att’y Gen.

Alaska school districts are not prohibited from enrolling students on a part-time basis in public school courses, but are not required to do so.
Private school students may be enrolled part time in public school classes subject to the same enrollment requirements as other students, and so long as the practice is not used by private schools on a widespread basis to provide the curriculum requirements of the private school.
Enrollment in extracurricular activities is similarly neither prohibited nor required.
June 24, 1993 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.03.083.
Contracting for services.

A school district may contract for educational services provided to students in the district by an agency that is accredited by the department under AS

14.07.020

and (b) of this section.

The department shall adopt regulations and establish program standards for educational services that may be contracted for by a school district.

Expenses incurred by the department in accrediting the agency and program shall be borne by the agency seeking accreditation.

The department and the state Board of Education and Early Development may not enter into or renew a contract or agreement, or participate, with any organization, entity, group, or consortium after July 1, 2014 that requires the state to cede any measure of autonomy or control over education standards and assessments, including the determination of passing scores.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 1973; am § 5 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, added (d).

Sec. 14.03.085.
Procurement preference for recycled Alaska products.

A school district shall comply with AS

29.71.050

, except that in AS

29.71.050(b)

, “AS

29.71.040

” is read as “AS

36.15.050

,” and in AS

29.71.050

(a) — (c) and (e), “municipal” and “municipality” are read as “school district.” In this section, “school district” does not include regional educational attendance areas.

History.

(§ 1 ch 63 SLA 1988; am § 30 ch 50 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For requirement that school districts, including REAAs, that receive state money comply with agricultural and fisheries products preference laws, see AS

36.15.050

.

Sec. 14.03.090.
Partisan, sectarian, or denominational doctrines prohibited.

Partisan, sectarian, or denominational doctrines may not be advocated in a public school during the hours the school is in session.
A teacher or school board violating this section may not receive public money.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For correspondence study programs, see 4 AAC 33, art. 4.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Although public school teachers may teach about various religions as part of the curriculum in public schools, they may not advocate a particular religious view or teach that a particular religious view is true or false. The Professional Training Practices Commission has jurisdiction to hear complaints about the inappropriate advocacy of personal religious views in the classroom, and to take appropriate disciplinary action if the complaints are justified. Sept. 15, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Education and Early Development properly informed districts operating statewide correspondence study programs that they must require parents to use primary curriculum materials that are secular in nature, approved in advance by the school district; the enforcement action and current regulations do not infringe upon the rights of parents and are consistent with the underlying statutes. Correspondence school students may not use religious materials in lieu of district approved textbooks and materials, but parents may privately supplement their child’s educational material with religious materials.
September 20, 2005 Op. Att’y Gen.

AS

14.03.090

applies to school districts and publicly employed teachers, but not to parents.
Parents who include religious instruction, including the use of privately obtained religious materials, in their home during their child’s correspondence course studies, may do so without violating the law. September 20, 2005 Op. Att’y Gen.

A book may not be approved for use in publicly provided education if it advocates a partisan, sectarian, or denominational doctrine.
To allow otherwise would permit a school board to advocate partisan, sectarian, and denominational doctrines in a public classroom through textbooks.
September 20, 2005 Op. Att’y Gen.

Exercising the authority to determine whether a textbook advocates religion is not unconstitutional censorship.
State statutes and regulations allowing local school boards to review and approve textbooks do not, on their face, violate the right of parents or students to freely exercise their religion.
September 20, 2005 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

Constitutionality of teaching or otherwise promoting secular humanism in public schools. 103 ALR Fed. 538.

Constitutionality of regulation or policy governing prayer, meditation, or “moment of silence” in public schools. 110 ALR Fed. 211.

Distribution or use of Bibles in public schools—modern cases. 111 A.L.R. Fed. 1.

Sec. 14.03.095.
Part-time school attendance.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a governing body shall, upon request, allow a child, including a child who is also enrolled at a private school, is a correspondence student, or is being home schooled, to enroll as a part-time student in the district. A governing body may not discriminate between part-time and full-time students or require that part-time students be enrolled after full-time student enrollment is completed.

A governing body is not required to allow part-time enrollment if

the enrollment would be denied even if the enrollee were a full-time student; or

the enrollment would result in an expenditure of public funds for the direct benefit of a private educational institution.

Part-time enrollment under this section does not constitute attendance for the purposes of AS

14.30.010(a)

.

This section does not apply to interscholastic or extracurricular student activities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 60 SLA 1997; am §§ 1, 2 ch 120 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For correspondence study programs, see 4 AAC 33, art. 4.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Alaska school districts are not prohibited from enrolling students on a part-time basis in public school courses, but are not required to do so.
Private school students may be enrolled part time in public school classes subject to the same enrollment requirements as other students, and so long as the practice is not used by private schools on a widespread basis to provide the curriculum requirements of the private school.
Enrollment in extracurricular activities is similarly neither prohibited nor required.
June 24, 1993 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.03.100.
Use of school facilities.

The governing body of a school district may allow the use of school facilities for any legal gatherings or assemblies.
The governing body shall adopt bylaws that will ensure reasonable and impartial use of the facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Collateral references. —

Constitutionality, construction, and application of statutes declaring that school buildings are civic centers, or otherwise providing for use of such buildings for other than school purposes. 79 ALR2d 1148, 94 ALR2d 1274.

Use of school property for other than public school or religious purposes. 94 ALR2d 1274.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents occurring during use of premises and equipment for other than school purposes. 37 ALR3d 712.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance forbidding unauthorized persons to enter upon or remain in school building or premises. 50 ALR3d 340.

Sec. 14.03.105.
Search of school lockers.

Subject to (b) of this section, a locker or other container provided in a school by the school or the school district may be searched and examined with the permission of the chief administrative officer of the school or the school district or the designee of the chief administrative officer to determine compliance with school regulations, school district regulations, and local, state, and federal laws. A search or examination under this section may not be more intrusive than reasonably necessary to meet the objectives of the search.

Notices in letters at least two inches high stating the right and the intention of school and school district officers to permit searches and examinations under (a) of this section shall be posted in prominent locations throughout a school.

Nothing in this section limits the ability of a peace officer, chief administrative officer, or other appropriate person, acting in compliance with local, state, or federal laws, to search a locker or other container provided in a public or private school by the school district.

History.

(§ 5 ch 33 SLA 1995)

Sec. 14.03.110.
Questionnaires and surveys administered in public schools.

A school district, principal or other person in charge of a public school, or teacher in a public school may not administer or permit to be administered in a school a questionnaire or survey, whether anonymous or not, that inquires into personal or private family affairs of the student not a matter of public record or subject to public observation unless written permission is obtained from the student’s parent or legal guardian.

For an anonymous questionnaire or survey, written permission required under (a) of this section may be obtained annually and is valid until the commencement of the subsequent school year or until the parent or legal guardian who gave permission submits a written withdrawal of permission to the school principal. The school shall provide each student’s parent or legal guardian at least two weeks’ notice before administering a questionnaire or survey described under this subsection.

If a school administers to a student a questionnaire or survey that is not anonymous, the school shall obtain the written permission required under (a) of this section from the student’s parent or legal guardian at least two weeks before the questionnaire or survey is administered.

The school shall give a student’s parent or guardian an opportunity to review the questionnaire or survey described under (b) or (c) of this section and shall give the parent or guardian written notice regarding

how the questionnaire or survey will be administered to the student;

how the results of the survey or questionnaire will be used; and

who will have access to the questionnaire, survey, or results.

A student may refuse to participate in a questionnaire or survey administered in a public school. A student’s parent or legal guardian may refuse to allow the student to participate in a specified questionnaire or survey.

In this section, “questionnaire or survey” means a list of questions to, or information collected from, a class or group of students.

History.

(§ 1 ch 23 SLA 1979; am §§ 1, 2 ch 63 SLA 1999; am § 5 ch 2 SSSLA 2015; am § 24 ch 54 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective October 7, 2015, in (d)(3), added “, or results” at the end, and made related changes.

Opinions of attorney general. —

AS

14.03.110

— As long as survey questions are limited to the student’s own activities and the survey does not ask the student questions about parents or other activities occurring within a student’s home, the 1997 Youth Behavior Risk Survey does not impermissibly invade the domain of the student’s private “

family

” affairs.
September 28, 1998 Op. Att’y Gen. (Issued before 1999 amendment to this section.)

Sec. 14.03.113.
District determination of scholarship eligibility.

A school district shall determine whether a student who graduates from a high school in the district is eligible for an award of an Alaska performance scholarship under AS

14.43.810

—

14.43.849

. If a student is eligible, the district shall state in the student’s permanent record the highest level of funding for which the student is eligible. A district shall provide a student with an opportunity to request that the district correct an error in the eligibility determination.

History.

(§ 1 ch 14 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in this section, “AS

14.43.849

” was substituted for “AS 14.43.850” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 14.43.850.

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions giving effect to regulations relating to scholarship applications under the Alaska merit scholarship program on or after January 1, 2011, see § 9, ch. 14, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective September 14, 2012, substituted “an Alaska performance scholarship” for “an Alaska merit scholarship program scholarship”.

Effective dates. —

Section 14, ch. 14, SLA 2010 makes this section effective July 1, 2011.

Sec. 14.03.115.
Access to school records by parent, foster parent, or guardian.

Upon request of a parent, foster parent, or guardian of a child under 18 years of age who is currently or was previously enrolled in a municipal school district or a school district that is a regional educational attendance area, the school district shall provide a copy of the child’s record. This section does not apply to

a record of a child who is an emancipated minor; or

record information that consists of the child’s address if the school district determines that the release of the child’s address poses a threat to the health or safety of the child.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1999)